Montana, session 2025, HB83.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Missing indigenous persons task force account -- audit. (1) There is a missing
indigenous persons task force account in the state special revenue fund established in 17-2-102. The account
is administered by the department of justice.
(2) Money transferred from any lawful source, including but not limited to gifts, grants, donations,
securities, and other assets, public or private, may be deposited in the account.
(3) Money deposited in the account must be used pursuant to 44-2-411 and is subject to audits as
required by Title 5, chapter 13, part 3.
(4) Funds deposited in the account each year must be used by the department only for allowable
costs as determined by the department and approved by the missing indigenous persons task force.
(5) Interest and income earned on the account and any unspent or unencumbered money in the
account at the end of a fiscal year must remain in the account.
Section 2. Appropriation. There is appropriated $1 from the missing indigenous persons task force
account established in [section 1] to the department of justice for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for the
purposes described in 44-2-411.
Section 3. Notification to tribal governments. The secretary of state shall send a copy of [this act]
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 83
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0083
to each federally recognized tribal government in Montana.
Section 4. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
44, chapter 2, part 4, and the provisions of Title 44, chapter 2, part 4, apply to [section 1].
Section 5. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
Section 6. Termination. [This act] terminates June 30, 2033.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 83
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 83, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 83
INTRODUCED BY T. RUNNING WOLF
BY REQUEST OF THE STATE TRIBAL RELATIONS COMMITTEE
AN ACT CREATING THE MISSING INDIGENOUS PERSONS TASK FORCE STATE SPECIAL REVENUE
ACCOUNT; PROVIDING THAT THE FUNDS IN THE ACCOUNT ARE SUBJECT TO THE LEGISLATIVE AUDIT
ACT; PROVIDING AN APPROPRIATION; AND PROVIDING AN EFFECTIVE DATE AND A TERMINATION
DATE.”